Utah statutes.
24-1-12.   Compensation for damaged property.
(1)  If property seized for forfeiture is returned by operation of this
chapter, an owner has a civil right of action against a seizing agency for any
claim based upon the negligent destruction, loss, damage, or other injury to
seized property while in the possession or custody of the agency.
(2)  As used in this section, "damage or other injury" does not include normal
depreciation, deterioration, or ordinary wear and tear.
